Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.20.010

Classification and designation of crimes.

(1) Classified Felonies. (a) The particular classification of each felony defined in Title 9A RCW is expressly designated in the section defining it.

(b) For purposes of sentencing, classified felonies are designated as one of three classes, as follows:

(i) Class A felony; or

(ii) Class B felony; or

(iii) Class C felony.

(2) Misdemeanors and Gross Misdemeanors. (a) Any crime punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than ninety days, or by both such fine and imprisonment is a misdemeanor. Whenever the performance of any act is prohibited by any statute, and no penalty for the violation of such statute is imposed, the committing of such act shall be a misdemeanor.

(b) All crimes other than felonies and misdemeanors are gross misdemeanors.

[ 1984 c 258 s 808; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.20.010.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.